test/src/morphology/N-njuammel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuäˊmmel contract stem jänis: # Noun - full paradigm
     njuäˊmmel+N+Sg+Nom: njuäˊmmel
     njuäˊmmel+N+Sg+Gen: njuäˊmmel
     njuäˊmmel+N+Sg+Acc: njuäˊmmel
     njuäˊmmel+N+Sg+Ill: njuäˊmmla
     njuäˊmmel+N+Sg+Loc: njuäˊmmlest
     njuäˊmmel+N+Sg+Com: njuäˊmmlin
     njuäˊmmel+N+Ess: njuäˊmmlen
     njuäˊmmel+N+Par: njuäˊmmled
     njuäˊmmel+N+Sg+Abe: njuäˊmmeltää
     njuäˊmmel+N+Pl+Nom: njuäˊmmel
     njuäˊmmel+N+Pl+Gen: njuäˊmmli
     njuäˊmmel+N+Pl+Acc: njuäˊmmlid
     njuäˊmmel+N+Pl+Ill: njuäˊmmlid
     njuäˊmmel+N+Pl+Loc: njuäˊmmlin
     njuäˊmmel+N+Pl+Com: njuäˊmmlivuiˊm
     njuäˊmmel+N+Pl+Abe: njuäˊmmlitää
     
